Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1704.03
Sheriff; employee; false return of writ; penalty.

The employee referred to in section 23-1704.02 shall make return of the time and manner of serving such writ under his or her oath. For making a false return he or she shall be guilty of perjury and shall be punished accordingly.

Laws 1879, § 126, p. 386;

R.S.1913, § 5740;

C.S.1922, § 5069;

C.S.1929, § 84-806;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-806;

Laws 1987, LB 223, § 3.